Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2024 Act is added to and  made a part of ORS chapter 197A.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) On or before January 1, 2026, the Land Conservation and Development
Commission shall adopt three model ordinances providing clear and objective  standards for
the development  of various housing types within an urban growth boundary, including
single-family detached housing, middle  housing, as defined in ORS 197A.420, accessory
dwelling units, as defined  in ORS 197A.425, and multifamily housing, that may be readily
adopted by a local government in compliance with the requirements of ORS 197.610.
(b) Among the three model ordinances adopted under this section:
(A) One must be targeted toward cities with a population of less than 2,500;
(B) One must be targeted toward cities with a population of 2,500 or greater and less than
25,000; and
(C) One must be targeted toward cities with a population of 25,000 or greater.
(c) In adopting model ordinances under this section, the commission:
(A) May consider geographic location and other regional factors; and
(B) May allow a city to adopt, in whole or in part, a model ordinance  targeted toward a
larger city.
(2) A model ordinance adopted under this section is presumed to have clear and  objective
standards.
(3) In adopting model ordinances under this section, the commission shall prioritize  the
principles and considerations under section 9 (2), chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2023.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 197A.400 is amended to read:
197A.400. (1) Except as provided in subsection (3)  of this section, a local government may adopt
and apply only clear  and objective standards, conditions and procedures regulating the development
of housing,  including needed housing, on land within an urban growth boundary. The standards,
conditions and procedures:
(a) May include, but are not limited to, one or more provisions regulating  the density or height
of a development.
(b) May not have the effect, either in themselves or cumulatively, of  discouraging needed hous-
ing through unreasonable cost or delay.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1564 (SB 1564-B) Page 1
(c) May be contained in a comprehensive  plan, land use regulation or an ordinance re-
lating to housing adopted by  a city that adopts, including by reference, a model ordinance
adopted by the Land Conservation and Development Commission that comports with any
qualifications, conditions or applicability of the model ordinance.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section do not apply to:
(a) An application or permit for residential development in an area identified in  a formally
adopted central city plan, or a regional center as defined by Metro, in a city with a population of
500,000 or greater.
(b) An application  or permit for residential development in historic areas designated for pro-
tection under a land use planning goal protecting historic areas.
(3) In addition to an approval process for needed housing based on clear and objective  stand-
ards, conditions and procedures as  provided in subsection (1) of this section, a local government may
adopt and apply an alternative  approval process for applications and permits for residential devel-
opment based on approval criteria that are not clear and objective if:
(a) The applicant retains the option  of proceeding under the approval process that meets the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section;
(b) The approval criteria for the  alternative approval process comply with applicable statewide
land use planning goals and rules; and
(c) The approval criteria for the alternative approval process authorize a density at  or above
the density level authorized in the zone under  the approval process provided in subsection (1) of this
section.
(4) Subject to subsection (1)  of this section, this section does not infringe on a local
government’s prerogative to:
(a) Set approval standards under which a particular housing type is permitted outright;
(b) Impose special conditions upon approval of a specific development proposal; or
(c) Establish approval procedures.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 197A.400, as amended by section 2, chapter 533, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
197A.400. (1) Except as provided in subsection (3)  of this section, a local government may adopt
and apply only clear  and objective standards, conditions and procedures regulating the development
of housing, including needed housing, on land within an urban growth boundary, unincorporated
communities designated in a county’s acknowledged comprehensive plan  after December 5, 1994,
nonresource lands and areas zoned for rural residential  use as defined in ORS 215.501. The stand-
ards, conditions and procedures:
(a) May include, but are not limited to, one or more provisions regulating  the density or height
of a development.
(b) May not have the effect, either in themselves or cumulatively, of  discouraging needed hous-
ing through unreasonable cost or delay.
(c) May be contained in a comprehensive  plan, land use regulation or an ordinance re-
lating to housing adopted by  a city that adopts, including by reference, a model ordinance
adopted by the Land Conservation and Development Commission that comports with any
qualifications, conditions or applicability of the model ordinance.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section do not apply to:
(a) An application  or permit for residential development in an area identified in a formally
adopted central city plan, or a regional center as defined by Metro, in a city with a population of
500,000 or greater.
(b) An application or permit for residential development in historic areas designated  for pro-
tection under a land use planning goal protecting historic areas.
(3) In  addition to an approval process for needed housing based on clear and objective stand-
ards, conditions and procedures as  provided in subsection (1) of this section, a local government may
adopt and apply an alternative approval process for applications and  permits for residential devel-
opment based on approval criteria that are not clear and objective if:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1564 (SB 1564-B) Page 2
(a) The applicant retains the option of proceeding under the  approval process that meets the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section;
(b) The approval criteria for the  alternative approval process comply with applicable statewide
land use planning goals and rules; and
(c) The approval criteria for the alternative approval process authorize a density at  or above
the density level authorized in the zone under  the approval process provided in subsection (1) of this
section.
(4) Subject to subsection (1)  of this section, this section does not infringe on a local
government’s prerogative to:
(a) Set approval standards under which a particular housing type is permitted outright;
(b) Impose special conditions upon approval of a specific development proposal; or
(c) Establish approval procedures.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 227.175 is amended to read:
227.175. (1) When required or authorized by a city, an owner of land may  apply in writing to the
hearings officer, or such other person as the city council designates,  for a permit or zone change,
upon such forms and in  such a manner as the city council prescribes. The governing body shall es-
tablish fees charged for processing permits at an amount no more than the actual or average  cost
of providing that service.
(2) The governing body of  the city shall establish a consolidated procedure by which an appli-
cant may apply at one time for all permits or zone changes needed for a development project. The
consolidated procedure [ shall be ] is  subject to the  time limitations set out in ORS 227.178. The
consolidated procedure shall be  available for use at the option of the applicant no later than the
time of the first periodic review of the comprehensive plan and land use regulations.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, the hearings officer shall  hold at least
one public hearing on the application.
(4)(a) A  city may not approve an application unless the proposed development of land would be
in compliance with the comprehensive plan for the city and other applicable land use regulation or
ordinance provisions , including an ordinance described in ORS 197A.400 (1)(c) . The approval may
include such conditions as are authorized by ORS 227.215 or any city legislation.
(b)(A) A city may not deny an application for a housing development located within the  urban
growth boundary if the development complies with clear and objective standards, including clear and
objective design standards contained in the city comprehensive plan or land use regulations.
(B) This paragraph does not apply to:
(i) Applications or permits  for residential development in areas described in ORS 197A.400 (2);
or
(ii) Applications or permits reviewed under an alternative approval process adopted under  ORS
197A.400 (3).
(c) A city  may not condition an application for a housing development on a reduction in density
if:
(A) The  density applied for is at or below the authorized density level under the local land use
regulations; and
(B) At least 75 percent of the floor area applied for is reserved for housing.
(d) A city may not condition an application for a housing development on a reduction  in height
if:
(A) The height applied for is at or  below the authorized height level under the local land use
regulations;
(B) At least 75 percent of the floor area applied for is reserved for housing; and
(C) Reducing the height has the effect of reducing the authorized density  level under local land
use regulations.
(e) Notwithstanding paragraphs (c) and (d)  of this subsection, a city may condition an applica-
tion for a housing development on a reduction in  density or height only if the reduction is necessary
to resolve a health, safety  or habitability issue or to comply with a protective measure adopted
Enrolled Senate Bill 1564 (SB 1564-B) Page 3
pursuant to a statewide land use planning goal. Notwithstanding ORS 197.350, the city must adopt
findings supported by substantial evidence demonstrating the necessity of the reduction.
(f) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Authorized density level” means the maximum number of lots  or dwelling units or the
maximum floor area ratio that is permitted under local land use regulations.
(B) “Authorized height level” means the maximum height of a structure  that is permitted under
local land use regulations.
(C) “Habitability” means being in  compliance with the applicable provisions of the state building
code under ORS chapter 455 and the rules adopted thereunder.
(5) Hearings  under this section may be held only after notice to the applicant and other inter-
ested persons and shall otherwise be conducted in conformance with the provisions  of ORS 197.797.
(6) Notice of a public hearing on a zone use application shall be provided to  the owner of an
airport, defined by the Oregon Department of Aviation as a “public use airport” if:
(a) The name and address of the airport owner has been provided  by the Oregon Department
of Aviation to the city planning authority; and
(b) The property subject to the zone use hearing is:
(A) Within 5,000 feet of the side or  end of a runway of an airport determined by the Oregon
Department of Aviation to be a “visual airport”; or
(B) Within 10,000 feet of the side or end of the runway of an airport determined by the Oregon
Department of Aviation to be an “instrument airport.”
(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection  (6) of this section, notice of a zone use hearing
need only be provided as set forth in subsection (6) of this section if the permit or  zone change
would only allow a structure less than 35 feet in height and the property is located outside  of the
runway “approach surface” as defined by the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(8) If an  application would change the zone of property that includes all or part of a mobile
home or manufactured dwelling park as defined in ORS  446.003, the governing body shall give
written notice  by first class mail to each existing mailing address for tenants of the mobile home
or manufactured dwelling park at least 20 days but not more than 40 days before the date  of the
first hearing on the application. The governing body may require an applicant for such a zone
change to pay the costs of such notice.
(9) The failure of a tenant or an airport  owner to receive a notice which was mailed [ shall] does
not invalidate any zone change.
(10)(a)(A) The hearings officer or such other person  as the governing body designates may ap-
prove or deny an application for a permit without a hearing if the hearings officer or  other desig-
nated person gives notice of the decision and provides an opportunity for any person who  is
adversely affected or aggrieved, or who is entitled to notice under paragraph (c) of this  subsection,
to file an appeal.
(B) Written notice of the decision shall be mailed to those persons described in  paragraph (c)
of this subsection.
(C) Notice under this subsection shall comply with ORS  197.797 (3)(a), (c), (g) and (h) and shall
describe  the  nature of the decision. In addition, the notice shall state that any person who is ad-
versely affected or aggrieved or who  is entitled to written notice under paragraph (c) of this sub-
section may appeal the  decision by filing a written appeal in the manner and within the time period
provided in the city’s land use regulations. A city may not establish an appeal period  that is less
than 12 days from  the date the written notice of decision required by this subsection was mailed.
The notice shall state that the decision will not become final until the period for filing  a local ap-
peal has expired. The notice also shall state that a person who is mailed written notice of  the de-
cision cannot appeal the decision directly to the Land Use Board of Appeals under ORS 197.830.
(D) An appeal from a hearings officer’s  decision made without hearing under this subsection
shall be to the planning  commission or governing body of the city. An appeal from such other person
as the governing body  designates shall be to a hearings officer, the planning commission or the
governing body. In either case, the appeal shall be to a de novo hearing.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1564 (SB 1564-B) Page 4
(E) The de novo hearing required by subparagraph (D) of  this paragraph shall be the initial
evidentiary  hearing  required under ORS 197.797 as the basis for an appeal to the Land Use Board
of Appeals. At the de novo hearing:
(i) The applicant and other parties shall  have the same opportunity to present testimony, argu-
ments and evidence as they would have had in a hearing under subsection  (3) of this section before
the decision;
(ii) The presentation of testimony, arguments and evidence [ shall] may  not be limited to issues
raised in a notice of appeal; and
(iii) The decision maker shall consider  all relevant testimony, arguments and evidence that are
accepted at the hearing.
(b) If a  local government provides only a notice of the opportunity to request a hearing, the
local government may charge a fee for the initial hearing. The maximum fee for an initial hearing
shall be  the cost to the local government of preparing for and conducting the appeal, or $250,
whichever is less. If an appellant prevails at the hearing or upon  subsequent appeal, the fee for the
initial hearing shall be refunded. The fee allowed in this paragraph [ shall] does not apply to appeals
made by neighborhood or community organizations recognized by the governing body  and whose
boundaries include the site.
(c)(A) Notice of a decision  under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be provided to the ap-
plicant and to the owners of record of property on the most recent property tax assessment  roll
where such property is located:
(i) Within 100 feet of the property  that is the subject of the notice when the subject property
is wholly or in part within an urban growth boundary;
(ii) Within  250 feet of the property that is the subject of the notice when the subject property
is outside an urban growth boundary and not within a farm or forest zone; or
(iii) Within 750 feet of the property that is the  subject of the notice when the subject property
is within a farm or forest zone.
(B) Notice shall also be  provided to any neighborhood or community organization recognized by
the governing body and whose boundaries include the site.
(C) At the discretion of the applicant, the local government also shall  provide notice to the
Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(11) A decision described in ORS 227.160 (2)(b) shall:
(a) Be entered in a registry available to the public setting forth:
(A) The street address or other easily understood geographic reference to the subject property;
(B) The date of the decision; and
(C) A description of the decision made.
(b) Be subject  to the jurisdiction of the Land Use Board of Appeals in the same manner as a
limited land use decision.
(c) Be subject to the appeal period described in ORS 197.830 (5)(b).
(12) At the option of the applicant, the local government shall provide  notice of the decision
described in ORS 227.160 (2)(b) in the manner required by ORS 197.797 (2), in  which case an appeal
to the board shall be filed  within 21 days of the decision. The notice shall include an explanation
of appeal rights.
(13) Notwithstanding other requirements of this section, limited land use decisions [ shall be] are
subject to the requirements set forth in ORS 197.195 and 197.828.
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Land Conservation and Development by section 1 (1), chapter 455,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for the planning program, is in-
creased by $550,000 for the purpose of adopting model ordinances.
SECTION 7. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1564 (SB 1564-B) Page 5
Passed by Senate March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1564 (SB 1564-B) Page 6